California statutes. Penal Code
 the Government Code. The list of victim’s personal effects may be withheld from the immediate family if providing information about the personal effects would interfere with the investigation being conducted by law enforcement.

(4) Information regarding the status of the investigation, at the discretion of the law enforcement agency.

(c) Law enforcement shall not be required to provide any information that would jeopardize or otherwise allow an individual to interfere with the ongoing investigation. This section shall not be interpreted to require law enforcement to provide investigative records generated pursuant to their investigation for inspection by a victim’s immediate family.

(d) This section does not require law
 enforcement agencies to provide more than one copy of the information provided pursuant to this section to immediate family.

(e) Law enforcement agencies providing information pursuant to this section may require any family member receiving the information to confirm their identity through a certified declaration. Any person knowingly or willingly making a false certification for a declaration pursuant to this subdivision shall be punishable by an infraction.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “immediate family” means the victim’s spouse, parent, guardian, grandparent,
 aunt, uncle, brother, sister, and children or grandchildren who are related by blood, marriage, or adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.   (SB 1268)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

679.10.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “certifying entity” is any of the following:

(1) A state or local law enforcement agency, including, without limitation, the police department of the University of California, a California State University campus, or the police department of a school district, established pursuant to Section 38000 of the Education Code.

(2) A prosecutor.

(3) A judge.

(4) Any other authority that has responsibility for the detection or investigation or prosecution of a qualifying
 crime or criminal activity.

(5) Agencies that have criminal detection or investigative jurisdiction in their respective areas of expertise, including, but not limited to, child protective services, the Civil Rights Department, and the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “certifying official” is any of the following:

(1) The head of the certifying entity.

(2) A person in a supervisory role who has been specifically designated by the head of the certifying entity to issue Form I-918 Supplement B certifications on behalf of that agency.

(3) A judge.

(4) Any other certifying official defined under Section 214.14 (a)(2) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Qualifying criminal activity” has the same meaning as qualifying criminal activity pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(U)(iii) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act which includes, but is not limited to, the following crimes:

(1) Rape.

(2) Torture.

(3) Human trafficking.

(4) Incest.

(5) Domestic violence.

(6) Sexual assault.

(7) Abusive sexual conduct.

(8) Prostitution.

(9) Sexual exploitation.

(10) Female genital mutilation.

(11) Being held hostage.

(12) Peonage.

(13) Perjury.

(14) Involuntary servitude.

(15) Slavery.

(16) Kidnapping.

(17) Abduction.

(18) Unlawful criminal restraint.

(19) False imprisonment.

(20) Blackmail.

(21) Extortion.

(22) Manslaughter.

(23) Murder.

(24) Felonious assault.

(25) Witness tampering.

(26) Obstruction of justice.

(27) Fraud in foreign labor contracting.

(28) Stalking.

(d) A “qualifying crime” includes criminal offenses for which the nature and elements of the offenses are substantially similar to the criminal activity described in subdivision (c), and the attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of those offenses.

(e) A “representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice” is a person who is approved by the United States Department of Justice to represent individuals before the Board of Immigration Appeals, the immigration courts, or the Department of Homeland Security. The representative shall be a person who works for a specific nonprofit, religious, charitable, social service, or similar organization that has been recognized by the
 United States Department of Justice to represent those individuals and whose accreditation is in good standing.

(f) Upon the request of a victim, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings, a state or local law enforcement agency with whom the victim had filed a police report shall provide a copy of the police report within seven days of the request.

(g) (1) Upon the request of the victim, victim’s family member, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings, a certifying official from a
 certifying entity shall certify victim helpfulness on the Form I-918 Supplement B certification, when the victim was a victim of a qualifying criminal activity and has been helpful, is being helpful, or is likely to be helpful to the detection or investigation or prosecution of that qualifying criminal activity. The certifying entity shall forward completed Form I-918 Supplemental B certification to the victim, victim’s family member, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings without requiring the victim to provide government-issued identification.

(2) A victim who submits a Form I-918 Supplement B certification to a certifying entity does not have to be
 present in the United States at time of submitting the certification request or filing the petition with the government and may apply for certification while outside of the United States.

(h) For purposes of determining helpfulness pursuant to subdivision (g), there is a rebuttable presumption that a victim is helpful, has been helpful, or is likely to be helpful to the detection or investigation or prosecution of that qualifying criminal activity, if the victim has not refused or failed to provide information and assistance reasonably requested by law enforcement.
 If the victim reasonably asserts they were unaware of a request for cooperation, their failure to cooperate does not rebut the presumption of helpfulness.

(i) (1) The certifying official shall fully complete and sign the Form I-918 Supplement B certification and, regarding victim helpfulness, include specific details about the nature of the crime investigated or prosecuted and a detailed description of the victim’s helpfulness or likely helpfulness to the detection or investigation or prosecution of the criminal activity.

(2) If a certifying entity does not certify a Form I-918 Supplement B certification, they shall provide a written explanation for the denial of the Form I-918 Supplement B certification.
 The written denial shall include specific details of any reasonable requests for cooperation and a detailed description of how the victim refused to cooperate.

(j) (1) A certifying entity shall process a Form I-918 Supplement B certification within 30 days of request, unless the noncitizen is in removal proceedings, in which case the certification shall be processed within 7 days of the first business day following the day the request was received.

(2) A certifying agency shall process a Form I-918 Supplement B certification within 7 days of the first business day following the day the request was received if the victim asserts a qualifying family member of the victim will lose eligibility for U nonimmigrant status in 60 days or fewer because the victim’s noncitizen sibling will turn 18 years of age, the victim’s noncitizen child will turn 21 years of age, or the victim will turn 21 years of age.

(k) (1) A current investigation, the filing of charges, an apprehension of the suspect who committed the qualifying crime, closing of a case, and a prosecution or conviction are not required for the victim to request and obtain the Form I-918 Supplement B certification from a certifying official.

(2) A certifying official shall not refuse to complete the Form I-918 Supplement B certification or to otherwise certify that a victim has been helpful, solely because a case has already been prosecuted or otherwise closed, or because the time for commencing a criminal action has expired.

(3) A certifying entity shall not refuse to complete the Form I-918 Supplement B certification and provide it to the victim, the victim’s family member, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings for any of the following reasons:

(A) The victim’s criminal history information.

(B) The victim’s immigration history.

(C) The victim’s gang membership or gang affiliation.

(D) The certifying entity’s belief that the Form I-918 Supplement B petition will not be approved by United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(E) The victim has an open case with another certifying entity.

(F) The extent of the harm the victim suffered.

(G) The victim’s inability to produce a crime report from a law enforcement agency.

(H) The victim’s cooperation or refusal to cooperate in a separate case.

(l) A certifying official may only withdraw the certification if the victim refuses to provide information and assistance when reasonably requested.

(m) A certifying entity is prohibited from disclosing the immigration status of a victim or person requesting the Form I-918
 Supplement B certification, except to comply with federal law or legal process, or if authorized by the victim or person requesting the Form I-918 Supplement B certification.

(n) A certifying entity that receives a request for a Form I-918 Supplement B certification shall report to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the number of victims that requested Form I-918 Supplement B certifications from the entity, the number of those certification forms that were signed, and the number that were denied. A report pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(o) (1) A certifying entity may certify a Form I-918 Supplement B certification for direct victims, indirect victims, and
 bystander or witness victims.

(2) A direct victim is any person who has suffered direct harm or who is directly and proximately harmed as a result of the criminal activity.

(3) (A) An indirect victim is a qualifying family member of a direct victim if the direct victim is incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, including spouses, unmarried children under the age of 21, parents if the direct victim was under the age of 21, and siblings under the age of 18 if the direct victim was under 21 years of age. Indirect victims shall cooperate in the investigation or
 prosecution but are not required to possess information about the crime itself.

(B) Indirect victim cooperation includes parents who make their children available to communicate with the certifying entity.

(4) A bystander or witness victim is any individual who was not the direct target of a crime, but who nevertheless suffered unusually direct injury as a result of the qualifying crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   (AB 1261)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

679.11.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “certifying entity” is any of the following:

(1) A state or local law enforcement agency, including, without limitation, the police department of the University of California, a California State University campus, or the police department of a school district, established pursuant to Section 38000 of the Education Code.

(2) A prosecutor.

(3) A judge.

(4) The Department of Industrial Relations.

(5) Any
 other state or local government agencies that have criminal, civil, or administrative investigative or prosecutorial authority relating to human trafficking.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “certifying official” is any of the following:

(1) The head of the certifying entity.

(2) A person in a supervisory role who has been specifically designated by the head of the certifying entity to issue Form I-914 Supplement B declarations on behalf of that agency.

(3) A judge.

(4) Any other certifying official defined under Section 214.14(a)(2) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Human trafficking” has the same meaning as “severe forms of trafficking in persons” pursuant to Section 7102 of Title 22 of the United States Code and includes either of the following:

(1) Sex trafficking in which a commercial sex act is induced by force, fraud, or coercion, or in which the person induced to perform such act has not attained 18 years of age.

(2) The recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision, or obtaining of a person for labor or services, through the use of force, fraud, or coercion for the purpose of subjection to involuntary servitude, peonage, debt bondage, or slavery.

(d) “Human trafficking” also includes criminal offenses for which
 the nature and elements of the offenses are substantially similar to the criminal activity described in subdivision (c), and the attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of those offenses.

(e) A “representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice” is a person who is approved by the United States Department of Justice to represent individuals before the Board of Immigration Appeals, the immigration courts, or the Department of Homeland Security. The representative shall be a person who works for a specific nonprofit, religious, charitable, social service, or similar organization that has been recognized by the United States Department of Justice to represent those individuals and whose accreditation is in good standing.

(f) (1) Upon the request of the victim, victim’s family member, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings, a certifying official from a certifying entity shall certify victim cooperation on the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration, when the victim was a victim of human trafficking and has been cooperative, is being cooperative, or is likely to be cooperative to the investigation or prosecution of human trafficking. The certifying entity shall forward completed Form I-914 Supplemental B certification to the victim, victim’s family member, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully
 accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings without requiring the victim to provide government-issued identification.

(2) A victim who submits a Form I-914 Supplement B declaration to a certifying entity does not have to be present in the United States at time of submitting the certification request or filing the petition with the government and may apply for certification while outside of the United States.

(g) For purposes of determining cooperation pursuant to subdivision (f), there is a rebuttable presumption that a victim is cooperative,
 has been cooperative, or is likely to be cooperative to the investigation or prosecution of human trafficking, if the
 victim has not refused or failed to provide information and assistance reasonably requested by law enforcement. If the victim reasonably asserts they were unaware of a request for cooperation, their failure to cooperate does not rebut the presumption of helpfulness.

(h) The certifying official shall fully complete and sign the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration and, regarding victim cooperation, include specific details about the nature of the crime investigated or prosecuted and a detailed
 description of the victim’s cooperation or likely cooperation to the detection, investigation, or prosecution of the criminal activity.

(i) (1) A certifying entity shall process a Form I-914 Supplement B declaration within 30 days of request, unless
 the noncitizen is in removal proceedings, in which case the declaration shall be processed within 7 days of the first business day following the day the request was received.

(2) A certifying agency shall process a Form I-918 Supplement B certification within 7 days of the first business day following the day the request was received if the victim asserts a qualifying family member of the victim will lose eligibility for T nonimmigrant status in 60 days or fewer because the victim’s noncitizen sibling will turn 18 years of age, the victim’s noncitizen child will turn 21 years of age, or the victim will turn 21 years of age.

(j) (1) A current investigation, an apprehension of the suspect who committed the
 qualifying crime, the filing of charges, closing of a case, or a prosecution or conviction is not required for the victim to request and obtain the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration from a certifying official.

(2) A certifying official shall not refuse to complete the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration and provide it to the victim, the victim’s family member, licensed attorney representing the victim, or representative fully accredited by the United States Department of Justice authorized to represent the victim in immigration proceedings or to otherwise certify that a victim has been helpful, solely because a case has already been prosecuted or otherwise closed, or because the time for commencing a criminal action has expired.

(3) A certifying entity shall not refuse to complete the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration for any of the following reasons:

(A) The victim’s criminal history information.

(B) The victim’s immigration history.

(C) The victim’s gang membership or gang affiliation.

(D) The certifying entity’s belief that the Form I-914 Supplement B
 petition will not be approved by United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.

(E) The victim has an open case with another certifying entity.

(F) The certifying entity’s belief that the victim is eligible for relief or protection under Section 679.10 or any other provision of law.

(G) The victim’s inability to produce a crime report from a law enforcement agency.

(H) The victim’s cooperation or refusal to cooperate in a separate case.

(k) A certifying official may only withdraw the certification if the victim
 refuses to provide information and assistance when reasonably requested.

(l) A certifying entity is prohibited from disclosing the immigration status of a victim or person requesting the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration, except to comply with federal law or legal process, or if authorized by the victim or person requesting the Form I-914 Supplement B declaration.

(m) A certifying entity that receives a request for a Form I-914 Supplement B declaration shall report to the Legislature, on or before January 1, 2018, and annually thereafter, the number of victims who requested Form I-914 Supplement B declarations from the entity, the number of those declaration forms that were signed, and the number that were denied. A report pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with Section
 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   (AB 1261)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

679.12.

(a) The following procedures apply to known reference samples of DNA from a victim of a crime or alleged crime, and to known reference samples of DNA from any individual that were voluntarily provided for the purpose of exclusion, as well as to any profiles developed from those samples:

(1) Law enforcement agencies and their agents shall use these DNA samples or profiles only for purposes directly related to the incident being investigated.

(2) No law enforcement agency or agent thereof may compare any of these samples or profiles with DNA samples or profiles that do not relate to the incident being investigated.

(3) No law enforcement
 agency or agent thereof may include any of these DNA profiles in any database that allows these samples to be compared to or matched with profiles derived from DNA evidence obtained from crime scenes.

(4) No law enforcement agency or agent thereof may provide any other person or entity with access to any of these DNA samples or profiles, unless that person or entity agrees to abide by the statutory restrictions on the use and disclosure of that sample or profile.

(5) Any part of a DNA sample that remains after the requested testing or analysis has been performed shall be securely stored and may only be used in accordance with the restrictions on use and disclosure of the sample provided in this section.

(6) No agent of a law enforcement agency may provide any part of these DNA samples or profiles to any person or
 entity other than the law enforcement agency that provided them, except portions of these remaining DNA samples may be provided to the defendant when authorized by court order.

(7) A person whose DNA profile has been voluntarily provided for purposes of exclusion shall have their searchable database profile expunged from all public and private databases if the person has no past or present offense or pending charge that qualifies that person for inclusion within the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Databank Program.

(8) This section does not prohibit crime laboratories from collecting, retaining, and using for comparison purposes in multiple cases the following DNA profiles:

(i) The DNA profiles from persons whose proximity or access to DNA case evidence during the collection, handling, or
 processing of that evidence might result in DNA contamination, including first responders, crime scene investigators, laboratory staff, or others at the laboratory, if these kinds of elimination samples are voluntarily provided with written consent for their use as quality assurance or control samples, or if the elimination samples are obtained as a condition of employment with written consent, so that the crime laboratory can assure reliable results.

(ii) The DNA profiles from persons associated with the manufacturing or production of consumable supplies or reagents or positive control samples used in laboratory testing, if these kinds of elimination samples are voluntarily provided with written consent.

(iii) The DNA profiles that may be incidentally encountered on consumable supplies or reagents such as plastic tubes, plastic plates, swabs, and buffers.

(9) The requirement for written consent for voluntary elimination samples does not preclude a DNA testing laboratory from retaining, for use consistent with this section, the voluntary quality assurance or control samples described in paragraph (8) that were provided without written consent by persons prior to the enactment of this section, or if the laboratory is otherwise required to retain such case samples by another provision of law.

(10) This section does not preclude a DNA testing laboratory from conducting a limited comparison of samples that were analyzed concurrently in order to evaluate the DNA typing results for potential contamination, determine the source of contamination when detected, and to ensure that the contaminating profiles were not misidentified as DNA profiles from putative perpetrators.

(11) This section does not affect the inclusion of samples in state DNA databases as described in Section 295, the use of state DNA databases for identifying missing persons, the compliance with other provisions of law that allow the release of samples for postconviction testing, or the use of reference samples from a suspect lawfully collected in a manner that does not violate this section.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) The “incident being investigated” means the crime or alleged crime that caused a law enforcement agency or agent to analyze or request a DNA sample from a victim of or witness to that crime or alleged crime.

(2) An “agent” of a law enforcement agency includes any person or entity that the agency provides with access to a DNA sample collected
 directly from the person of a victim of or witness to a crime or alleged crime, or to any profile developed from those samples. This includes, but is not limited to, public or private DNA testing facilities.

(3) A “victim” or “witness” does not include any person who is a target of the investigation of the incident being investigated, if law enforcement agents have probable cause to believe that person has committed a public offense relating to the incident under investigation.

(4) A sample is “voluntarily provided for the purpose of exclusion” if law enforcement agents do not consider the individual to be a suspect and have requested a voluntary DNA sample in order to exclude that person’s DNA profile from consideration in the current investigation.

(c) This section does not apply to evidence arising from the victim
 that is biological material that is not the victim’s own and is not from an individual who voluntarily provided a reference sample for exclusion, such as DNA transferred from an assailant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 151.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

679.13.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “certifying entity” is any of the following:

(1) A state or local law enforcement agency, including, without limitation, the police department of the University of California, a California State University campus, or the police department of a school district, established pursuant to Section 38000 of the Education Code.

(2) A prosecutor.

(3) A judge.

(4) Any other authority that has responsibility for the detection or investigation or
 prosecution of a qualifying crime or criminal activity.

(5) Agencies that have criminal detection or investigative jurisdiction in their respective areas of expertise, including, but not limited to, child protective services, the Civil Rights Department, and the Department of Industrial Relations.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “certifying official” is any of the following:

(1) The head of the certifying entity.

(2) A person in a supervisory role who has been specifically designated by the head of the certifying entity to issue Form
 I-854A certifications on behalf of that agency.

(3) A judge.

(4) Any other certifying official defined under Section 214.14 (a)(2) of Title 8 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Qualified criminal informant” is an individual who meets the following requirements:

(1) The informant must have reliable information about an important aspect of a crime or pending commission of a crime.

(2) The informant must be willing to share that information with United States law enforcement officials or become a witness in court.

(3) The informant’s presence in the United States is important and leads to the successful investigation or prosecution of that crime.

(d) A certifying entity may apply for and may certify a Form I-854A certification for a qualified criminal informant. A qualified informant does not have to be present in the United States for certification pursuant to this section.

(e) The certifying official shall fully complete and sign the Form
 I-854A
 certification and, regarding the qualified criminal informant’s helpfulness, include specific details about the nature of the crime investigated or prosecuted and a detailed description of the
 qualified criminal informant’s helpfulness or likely helpfulness to the detection or investigation or prosecution of the criminal activity.

(f) A certifying official may only withdraw the certification if the qualified criminal informant refuses to provide information and assistance when reasonably requested.

(g) A certifying entity is prohibited from disclosing the immigration status of the qualified criminal informant for whom Form I-854A certification has been completed, except to comply with federal law or legal process, or if
 authorized by the qualified criminal informant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 679, Sec. 3.   (AB 1261)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Sexual Assault Victims’ DNA Bill of Rights.”

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) and forensic identification analysis is a powerful law enforcement tool for identifying and prosecuting sexual assault offenders.

(2) Existing law requires an adult arrested for or charged with a felony and a juvenile adjudicated for a felony to submit DNA samples as a result of that arrest, charge, or adjudication.

(3) Victims of sexual assault have a strong interest in the investigation and prosecution of their cases.

(4) Law enforcement agencies have an obligation to victims of sexual assault in the proper handling, retention, and timely DNA testing of rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence and to be responsive to victims concerning the developments of forensic testing and the investigation of their cases.

(5) The growth of the Department of Justice’s Cal-DNA databank and the national databank through the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) makes it possible for many sexual assault perpetrators to be identified after their first offense, provided that rape kit evidence is analyzed in a timely manner.

(6) Timely DNA analysis of rape kit evidence is a core public safety issue affecting men, women, and children in the State of California. It is the intent of the Legislature, in order to further public safety, to encourage DNA analysis of rape kit evidence within the time limit imposed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803.

(7) DNA reference samples collected directly from a victim of sexual assault, and reference samples of DNA collected from any individual that were voluntarily provided for the purpose of exclusion, shall be protected as provided in Section 679.12.

(c) To ensure that sexual assault forensic evidence is analyzed within the timeframe required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803 and to ensure the longest possible statute of limitations
 for sex offenses, including sex offenses designated pursuant to those subparagraphs, the following shall occur:

(1) A law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction a sex offense specified in Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a occurred shall do one of the following for sexual assault forensic evidence received by the law enforcement agency on or after January 1, 2016:

(A) Submit sexual assault forensic evidence to the crime lab within 20 days after it is booked into evidence.

(B) Ensure that a rapid turnaround DNA program is in place to submit forensic evidence collected from the victim of a sexual assault directly from the medical facility where the victim is examined to the crime lab within
 five days after the evidence is obtained from the victim.

(2) The crime lab shall do one of the following for sexual assault forensic evidence received by the crime lab on or after January 1, 2016:

(A) Process sexual assault forensic evidence, create DNA profiles when able, and upload qualifying DNA profiles into CODIS as soon as practically possible but no later than 120 days after initially receiving the evidence.

(B) Transmit the sexual assault forensic evidence to another crime lab as soon as practically possible, but no later than 30 days after initially receiving the evidence, for processing of the evidence for the presence of DNA. If a DNA profile is created, the transmitting crime lab shall upload the
 profile into CODIS as soon as practically possible but no longer than 30 days after being notified about the presence of DNA.

(3) This subdivision does not require a lab to test all items of forensic evidence obtained in a sexual assault forensic evidence examination. A lab is considered to be in compliance with the guidelines of this section if representative samples of the evidence are processed by the lab in an effort to detect the foreign DNA of the perpetrator.

(4) This section does not require a DNA profile to be uploaded into CODIS if the DNA profile does not meet federal guidelines regarding the uploading of DNA profiles into CODIS.

(5) For purposes of this section, a “rapid turnaround DNA program” is a program for
 the training of sexual assault team personnel in the selection of representative samples of forensic evidence from the victim to be the best evidence, based on the medical evaluation and patient history, the collection and preservation of that evidence, and the transfer of the evidence directly from the medical facility to the crime lab, which is adopted pursuant to a written agreement between the law enforcement agency, the crime lab, and the medical facility where the sexual assault team is based.

(6) For the purpose of this section, “law enforcement” means the law enforcement agency with the primary responsibility for investigating an alleged sexual assault.

(d) (1) Upon the request of a sexual assault victim, the law enforcement agency investigating a
 violation of Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a shall inform the victim of the status of the DNA testing of the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from the victim’s case. The law enforcement agency may, at its discretion, require that the victim’s request be in writing. The law enforcement agency shall respond to the victim’s request with either an oral or written communication, or by email, if an email address is available. This subdivision does not require that the law enforcement agency communicate with the victim or the victim’s designee regarding the status of DNA testing absent a specific request from the victim or the victim’s designee.

(2) A sexual assault victim has the right to access the Department of Justice’s SAFE-T database portal consistent with subdivision (e) of
 Section 680.3 for information involving their own forensic kit and the status of the kit.

(3) A sexual assault victim has the right to be informed of the following:

(A) Whether or not a DNA profile of the assailant was obtained from the testing of the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from their case.

(B) Whether or not the DNA profile of the assailant developed from the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence has been
 entered into the Department of Justice Data Bank or the federal Department of Justice or Federal Bureau of Investigation CODIS database of case evidence.

(C) Whether or not there is a confirmed match between the DNA profile of the assailant developed from the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence and a DNA profile contained in the Department of Justice Convicted Offender DNA Database, provided that disclosure would not impede or compromise an ongoing investigation.

(4) This subdivision is intended to encourage law enforcement agencies to notify victims of information that is in their possession. It does not affect the manner of or frequency with which the Department of Justice provides this information to law enforcement agencies.

(e) If the law enforcement agency does not analyze DNA evidence within six months prior to the time limit established by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803, a victim of a sexual assault offense specified in Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a shall be informed, either orally or in writing, of that fact by the law enforcement agency.

(f) (1) If the law enforcement agency intends to destroy or dispose of rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from an unsolved sexual assault case, a victim of a violation of Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a shall be given written notification by the law enforcement agency of that intention.

(2) A law enforcement agency shall not destroy or dispose of rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from an unsolved sexual assault case before at least 20 years or, if the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the alleged offense, before the victim’s 40th birthday.

(g) Written notification under subdivision (e) or (f) shall be made at least 60 days prior to the destruction or disposal of the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from an unsolved sexual assault case.

(h) (1) A sexual assault victim may designate a sexual assault victim advocate, or other support person of the victim’s choosing, to act as a recipient of the above information required to be provided by this section.

(2) A sexual assault survivor who is 18 years of age or older and who is undecided whether to report to law enforcement at the time of an examination may request that all medical evidence collected from them not be tested. A kit for which this request has been made shall not be tested and shall not be subject to the requirements of this section, Section 680.3, or Section 680.4, with the exception that the investigating agency in possession of the kit shall follow the requirements of subdivisions (f) and (g).

(A) If this request is made at the time of the examination, the medical facility shall not submit the kit to a crime laboratory, and the investigating agency shall
 retain the kit until the sexual assault survivor requests testing.

(B) If this request is made after the examination, the request may be directed to the investigating agency. If the kit has not yet been submitted to a crime laboratory at the time the request is received, the kit shall be retained by the investigating agency. If the kit has already been submitted to a laboratory but DNA testing has not yet begun, the investigating agency shall notify the laboratory of the request and the untested kit shall be returned to the investigating agency and retained.

(C) For purposes of this section, the
 transfer of a sexual assault kit by a medical facility to a crime laboratory representative solely for secure transport, intake, or evidence triage on behalf of the investigating agency shall not constitute submission for testing. All such transfers shall be documented in the chain of custody record or other state-approved tracking system, and shall not affect statutory retention timelines or survivor notification requirements.

(3) A sexual assault survivor who has requested that their kit not be tested may later request that their kit be tested, regardless of whether they also decide to make a report to law enforcement.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that a law enforcement agency responsible for providing information under subdivision (d) do so in a timely manner and, upon
 request of the victim or the victim’s designee, advise the victim or the victim’s designee of any significant changes in the information of which the law enforcement agency is aware. In order to be entitled to receive notice under this section, the victim or the victim’s designee shall keep appropriate authorities informed of the name, address, telephone number, and email address of the person to whom the information should be provided and any changes of the name, address, telephone number, and email address, if an email address is available.
